Maryland, session 2026, SB0768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “Local Fire and Police System” means the Local Fire and Police
System established under Title 28 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(b) This section applies to an individual who:
(1) is an active member of the State Police Retirement System;
(2) is eligible for a vested benefit from the Local Fire and Police System;
(3) is not an active member in the Local Fire and Police System; and
(4) incurred a break in employment:
(i) after ceasing employment in a position in which the individual
was required to be a member in the Local Fire and Police System; and
(ii) before beginning employment as a member of the State Police
Retirement System.
(c) Notwithstanding § 37–202(a) of the State Personnel and Pensions Article, an
individual described under subsection (b) of this section may transfer the individual’s
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0768*

SENATE BILL 768
creditable service in the Local Fire and Police System to the State Police Retirement System
in accordance with Title 37 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article.
(d) An individual described under subsection (b) of this section shall make a
request to transfer service in accordance with subsection (c) of this section:
(1) on or before December 31, 2026; and
(2) by submitting to the Board of Trustees for the State Retirement and
Pension System a form provided by the State Retirement Agency for the purpose of electing
to transfer service under this Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 6 months and, at the end of December 31,
2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.